Maryland, session 2025, HB0762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
10–205.
[(a) It is the goal of the State that at least 55% of Maryland’s adults age 25 to 64
will hold at least an associate’s degree by the year 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0762*

HOUSE BILL 762
(b) It is the goal of the State that all degree–seeking students enrolled in a public
community college earn an associate’s degree before leaving the community college or
transferring to a public senior higher education institution.]
[(c)] (A) Institutions of higher education should utilize educational resources to
provide the greatest possible benefit to the citizens of the State and to foster economic
development.
[(d)] (B) In each region of the State, institutions of higher education should
cooperate to ensure an effective and efficient education system.
[(e)] (C) In developing missions and programs, the Maryland Higher Education
Commission and each governing board and its constituent institutions shall consider the
role, mission, and function of other public senior higher education institutions, particularly
those institutions offering unique programs and services in the same geographical region.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET GOALS FOR THE STATE FOR:
(1) MARYLAND’S ADULTS AGE 25 TO 64 HOLDING A POSTSECONDARY
DEGREE OR CERTIFICATE;
(2) MARYLAND STUDENTS COMPLETING A POSTSECONDARY
CREDENTIAL OF VALUE EACH YEAR; AND
(3) INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION’S GOALS FOR RESEARCH
AND INNOVATION ALIGNED WITH MARYLAND’S ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND
WORKFORCE SECTORS; AND
(4) (3) ANY OTHER POLICY THE COMMISSION DETERMINES IS
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE
PROVIDE THE GREATEST POSSIBLE BENEFIT TO THE CITIZENS OF THE STATE AND
TO FOSTER ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.